Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2367
Revisor of Statutes; duty.

In any section of the law dealing with the deposit of funds of any political subdivision, the Revisor of Statutes shall substitute or add the term capital stock financial institution, as defined in section 77-2366, for the term bank so long as the result is not inconsistent with the intention of sections 77-2366 and 77-2367.

Laws 1988, LB 488, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 78.